Wisconsin, session 2025, SB391.
do enact as follows:SB391,13Section 1. 347.446 of the statutes is created to read:SB391,2,24347.446 Audiovisual recording on school buses. (1) Subject to sub. (2), 5a school bus may be equipped with a device for recording audio or video, or both, of 1the interior of the school bus while the school bus is being used to transport pupils 2to and from school and school-sponsored activities.SB391,2,63(2) Subsection (1) applies only if the applicable school board adopts a policy 4authorizing audiovisual recording on school buses and notice of the policy is 5provided to pupils and their parents or guardians and clearly posted on the interior 6of the school bus.SB391,2,107(3) Recordings made as authorized under this section shall remain 8confidential and may be used by only school officials and law enforcement personnel 9for investigations, school disciplinary actions, and criminal prosecutions related to 10incidents occurring in or around the bus.SB391,2,1111